Ohio, session 136, HB655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2919.24 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2919.24. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Delinquent child" has the same meaning as in section 2152.02 of the Revised Code. (2) "Unruly child" has the same meaning as in section 2151.022 of the Revised Code. (B) No person, including a parent, guardian, or other custodian of a child, shall do any of the following: (1) Aid, abet, induce, cause, encourage, or contribute to a child or a ward of the juvenile court becoming an unruly child or a delinquent child; (2) Act in a way tending to cause a child or a ward of the juvenile court to become an unruly child or a delinquent child; (3) Act in a way that contributes to an adjudication of the child as a delinquent child based on the child's violation of a court order adjudicating the child an unruly child for being an habitual truant; (4) If the person is the parent, guardian, or custodian of a child who has the duties under Chapters 2152. and 2950. of the Revised Code to register, register a new residence address, and periodically verify a residence address, and, if applicable, to send a notice of intent to reside, and if the child is not emancipated, as defined in section 2919.121 of the Revised Code, fail to ensure that the child complies with those duties under Chapters 2152. and 2950. of the Revised Code; (5) If the child has been previously adjudicated as an unruly child or a delinquent child and the person is the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child, knowingly fail to take reasonable steps to prevent further unruly or delinquent conduct by the child; (6) If the person is the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child, recklessly fail to ensure the child does not become an habitual truant or recklessly fail to ensure the child's compliance with any previously imposed order of the juvenile court or domestic relations court relative to the child. (C)(C)(1) Whoever violates division (B)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section is guilty of contributing to the unruliness or delinquency of a child, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Each day of violation of this section is a separate offense. (2) Except as provided in division (C)(3) of this section, whoever violates division (B)(5) or (6) of this section is guilty of neglect of parental duties, a misdemeanor of the first degree. In addition to any other penalty imposed for the offense, the court shall order the offender to complete a parenting class. (3) If the person has previously been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one or more violations of division (B)(5) or (6) of this section, neglect of parental duties is a felony of the fifth degree. In addition to any other penalty imposed for the offense, the court shall order the offender to complete a parenting class. Section 2. That existing section 2919.24 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.